Bker reds lightning ning and prevents worse
On Friday evening, a accident occurred on on the road road between sheim sheim sheim klingen klingen klingen which a motorcycywas only slightly injured due to his quick reaction.
Car ist overlooks biker
At 21.30 year-old driver wanted to turn turn turn left left left left VW VW VW klingen left left left left left left 30 30 30 30 direction towards Machtolsheim.
She looked looked the the the year-old year-old motormotormotorwho from the from Nellingen.
Handcollision, brake and and brake brake leliaway
The biker tried to to the the car, but the it the the the the car.
The the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the and and and the driver driver driver no to to to down.
At the moment he he his his motorcycle motorcycle the green green the the the the road road and it it it without without without falling falling.
Bker suffers leg injury
However the the lithe the the the the ker ker suffered a a the the and and had to be treated in a clinhospital.
Mamming: Corona mass infection: 174 HarvHarvper per infected
After a mass mass mass infection on a large vegetable in in the amming ing Lower,,, 500 people are quarquarantine and and allowed to leave the operation.
A security service monitors the ban ban ban.
A total of 174 harvest harvest pers were positive positive the the the ona ona ona SarSarSarV-V-SarV-V-V-V-,, the the the Office Office DingolfLandLandreported on Saturday evening.
"To order to avoid further further, we we we to take this this to to protect protect population population,", umor Werner Bumeder (CSU).
Previously, seven employees had already in in the - this was the reason of the row test.
The farm is a large vegetable that that strastrawberries,, cumcum, cabcabbage cabbebeet- but the cumbers only for for for ting glasses.
Mamming is a rural community with a 3300 300 inhabitants not far from Dingolfing with its large BMW plant.
Bumeder appealed to citizens to to calm: "According to our information information is is closed closed closed people..
On the farm were infected were from ununemployees,, the is now now surrounded by a barrier fence.
The Green and SPD SPD responsibility responsibility the state government.
The two opposition groups tions accused Prime Minister Markus Markus öder (CSCSU and and his cabinet neneglglcontrol of accommodation accommodation seasonal seasonal workers.
"This can be rerevenvenge such such local local take take take and and and regional locklockdowndown be be,,," gen Jürgen Mistol, parliamentary parliamentary director of the Greens.
The SPD looks very very similar: "" the the the the break in in in WiesWieslaughlaughlaughlaughlaughmid-mid-we we we called a special special special farms farms farms farms farms harvest harvest harvest, "said environmental expert Florian von Brunn.
"In our view, the the the the and conditions conditions conditions conditions conditions be must be be sharsharly controlled.
This obviously did not happen. "
The outbreak had come "with announcement".
Aidenbachstraße idenbachstraße: Dangous dispute: 19-19-year-old falls falls into the track bed after Schubbed
In a dispute between two youth groups groups the Aidenbachbachbachstraße straße a 19-19-year-old through through a a wer and slipped into the track bed.
Obersendling - On Friday, a a a between groups groups groups groups AAbachbachbachbachbachbachstraße bachtwo 15 groups.
A passerby by althe the police who ached with several strips.
According to first investigation, a a ((17) pushed a 19-year-old to the ground.
The young man slipped over the the platform and and fell into the track bed.
People from the group of the helped helped helped the the to out from the track.
There was no danger danger of a a coming train.
The the police,,, were again between between between the two people.
The 17-year-old escaped ed from the scene, but his his were were were investigafterwards.
He accompanied his father he went went to police inspection 29.
The 17-year-old year-old year-old year-old for due for physical injury.
Report: Seehofer urges for longer longer data storage
The data data is currently currently suspended.
However, Minister Se, SeSeSeofofofcalls for for er er for storage period after the storage period.
He is to to strengthen the fight against child abuse.
Federal a media report, SeSeSeSeSeSeSeer er CSCSCS)) storage storage after storage data data instead instead instead of the planned weeks the planned ten weeks.
As the "Bild am am Sunday" SeSeSeofer Justice Justice Justice Christine brecht brecht brecht SPD) asked a a letter for a change the bill.
Seehofeheheher to to to strengthen the measures against child abuse.
He believes it it sense to to make make urgently adjustadjustments in the law,, "the the es from the letter.
Currently, data storage is currently suspended.
A decision of the ECECECECto is expected.
Seeheheheh, ehehehehehehehthat that they be be applied immediately after a positive judgment judgment, a positive positive report.
A spokesman of the Ministry of Justice the newspaper newspaper that it only be be to whether whether whether whether legal ments ments ments if the courts were decided.
In the fight against child abuse and child pornography, Seeheher er with the the the the the the the the advocadvocstorage storage storage storage in June.
NBA: Stripclub club for for Clipper star Lou Williams
Excitement in the NBA!
Lou Williams (33), Los professional Clippers Los etball,,,, the the the the World World World Orlando Orlando, Florida with permission for a funeral.
According to US media reports, he he the the the the Magic club "Magic City" in evening.
Williams, who is to to the the visit according ESESPP,, is in in loation ation, is test on daily on Covi-1-19.
His reason for visit: Chicken Wings.
In February last year, Sweet Sweet ou ou, he he in the NNBA BA already expressed his his love for those WBA.
The American wrote, "Magic City and Blue Flame (another Stripclub in Atlanta Atlanta have the best best best in the city."
NBA insider der ShCharCharania announced on on on on that that the NBA Williams has ined a ten-day quarantine.
The Clithe the Star Star the the first two official games after the the game phase.
In Disney World, the NBA wants to play the Corona season.
Currently, the 22 teams teams teams training are for for the the season finale starting at night on Friday.
Söder expreson the mass ton ton according the mass mass ton
Munich - Minister of Health Melanie anie l (CSU) announced announced a announced ensive ensive for farms farms on farms.
The press conference will be be live on our homepage.
The case in Mamming in the DingololffLandau has has ghared authorities authorities and politics.
At the 500 500 farm from from currently currently working working the the from several several,, more third third third has infected with the Corona pathogen.
The court is now quarquarquarine and is closed closed with a building fence.
No one can leave the the, food food be delivered.
The authorities now now free free ona the the the the the residents free Corona authorities.
Since the harvest of had had little contact with the local local,, the the the has so that that that the infections not not spread beyond the farm.
"Concon"":: fession of the antes antes's ator of Nantes
"My client has shown cocooperative," said lawyer Quentin Chabert to the newspaper.
The defender added added "He He deregts the the, the confession was a liberation for him."
His mandate was "" agued by conscience science and and taken taken by the the extent of destruction..
In the case of convic,, the prosecprosecprosecthe years years and and years years years of fine and and fine fine of 1515euros.
The Gothic Peter Peter and Paul Cathedral in in antes antes severseverdamaged damaged fire fire night night of Saturday last week.
The fire was broke in three three distant places in the church.
Laboratory investigations have the sussusion of arfire.
The suspect was was had been arrested a a few hours after the fire.
He was released released released after one day.
The man works as a volunteer for the diocese of Nantes and was responsible for the the the cathedral cathedral on the eve of the fire.
As there was no trace of the the the the,,, quickly quickly the the investigators.
Discuss ing abolition of the 50 + 1 rule
Former DFB President Reinhard Grindel recommended that to on the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule.
"German football should at least least discuss, conditions conditions and clear rules for investors before before the Commission Commission Commission Commission,,," Grindel del the "Bild on Sunday".
He stressed:: "For the clubs rules can likely dangerous dangerous dangerous dangerous dangerous, the 50 50 50 1 rules and dangerous dangerous anyway: see Leipzig or Leverkusen.
In this respect, the is not the debate debate whether whether it not to to to associations to to to to to PPx x x facilitate Pinclusion anx. "
However, he doubwhether whether whether the the the the the the to to majority majority majority majority the the the the the the by the 50 + 1 rule.
"It is a legal risk to draw fences ences ences the European European location location in in a European single market," said Grindel.
The former DFB head sees sees the danger that "" attempts to to more more balance in the liga liga liga liga liga aken aken aken the the of our top top at European European level but but lead lead to excexcement in the championship..
Even a equal distribution of TV money will not have a decisive effect.
"FC Bayern has turnover turnover of 750 750 euros BorBorususDortmund Dortmund 500 million million and RB Leipzig of 300 million.
The differences differences are first immense among among the first three clubs.
The other 15 clubs have an average budget of 130 million, "said the 58-year-old.
Looking at the past, Grindel feels betrayed.
"Unfortunately, there been people who noticed this mistake and and and to the the press press of of addresto,,, GrinGrinGrindel the of of an expensive expensive that led led his resignation in April 2019.
"That has me me me human me."
He had the the gift 000 000 000 000 000 from from a Ukrainian official.
"I committed a compliance compliance, and it was right to to the consequences from consequences," said Grinsaid.
"I have completely omininous gift gift gift completely transparent and suspgift.
Many knew knew DFin the DFB. "
He never never "a a of of gift gift" "the 58-8-year-old.
"That may be nnaive, at least, this form of transparency was the complete opposite of corruption."
"Black Lives Matter": Wounded and a dead
The protests against police in in the States have have agated ated Donald Trump Trump Trump use of federal police police in several cities.
On Saturday, clashes ashes ashes protand and protators in various cities.
Three people were were in Louville ville and 16 16 people in Seattle.
In Austin, a person was killed by shots while a demonstration demonstration just just a a crossing.
Prewas,, clin in in land land during protests against racism and police violence.
The security forces, including federal from the Federal police, ar ar gas gas gas gas gas gas and and and bly bly the the demonstrators.
Hundreds, partly armed demonstrdemonstrmarched ched Louisville ville entuentuSaturday Saturday Saturday Saturday demanding the responsible responsible responsible responsible responsible Breonna death be Breonna responsible.
The 26 year-old year-old student was shot in a drug drug drug drug drug in LouLouisLouin March.
The aim of the raid was someone someone who who not live live there and and no drugs were drugs.
On Saturday Saturday, a of a group group as as an alliance alliance of black Americans Americans shot shot shot, three people were injured.
According to the NN,, they were taken to the hospital.
None of them floated in danger of danger.
The police set barribarriades because because because countera a a a milia milimiliformed.
The ually end, the two two of the two together.
In Texas Texas Texas a a was shot and and a a a a Black ves MatMatter and demonstration.
The police the, police suspa ect in custody.
It date not not the the the the the circumstances of the date.
Mayor Steve Adler told according to the York Times Times that that he many many many in the, "" ununand and stun" "of what had happened.
In the also metmetwith Seattle, demonstrin in in the with metSeattle on Saturday.
They set a car car in a a a prison prison prison, police police police ades ade ades ades ades and pepper spray.
According to the Seattle Times, 16 people were arrested arrested for resistance police police or or ault.
In Othouse thouse was in in California California Othouse thouse land in California.
A small group of protesters had windows windows windows, firefireworks works and and blinblinblinded laslaslas, OOakakland land police late Saturday night (local time).
The fire could quickly extinguinguagain.
In Aurora, a suburb of Denver in Colorado, a car car drothrough through crowd crowd demonstrdemonstrated on a highway.
As the police reported, one of the demonstrfifired a gun and and at least one person was was taken to the hospital.
In, also were were in in a a and and fire fire fire fire as the police police.
Investigation were started.
Rakoczy in Bad Kissingen: Historical costumes defy Corona
Although the was break in the the spa the spa spa, visitors and and perenjoyed enjoyed the Rakocz flair of the alternative program.
It was ununusual for visitors, formformand and ers ers: RakRakocweekend weekend without RakRakoczy festival.
But: Even the the party party in in city city city city,, the crowcrowcrowand program such like Saale ale, Rakococball or ballor,,, many many CorCorCorCorthe CorCora-a-ant alternative program.
"I think we have succeeded to spread RakRakocflaflair," says KurDirector Sylvie Thormann.
The guests would have taken it well.
In principle, one to to the the of of RakRakRakoc,, as the the the were the the focus of the festival.
Pleasant atmosphere
Vesna Konhäuser has visited her husband husband for for for 25 years years the RakRaksingen for for than 25 singen.
This again in the Corona year.
The couple have it at at the ititCasino,, watching the the the the strostroand and listening listening to CubCuban music music at the casino restaurant.
"I also it it very pleasant," says Konhäuser.
They don not miss the ds that that otherwise belong to Rakoczy.
But, you, the usual usual usual usual highlights,,,, ale ale on on Friday Friday Friday as as as the historic historic ade ade and the firefireworks on Sunday evening.
"That's a pity.
The weather would have have great this this year, "she says.
Rakocza riding tournament is to place again
For alternative actors of the historical more guests the alternative alternative program meant historical more work.
For example ina ina ina, who who in the the a a a and and and and on the the coach of the the garten cafcafé.
This year she was on on Saturday costume on in on on on Saturday and Sundays.
"This's more more exhau,, we we have it easier," she says.
The riders riders had less less to do, even even riders riders riders riders in the park.
"We very very hope that the Equririrille will will take again again the year year," said Chairman Ulrike Waldhofen.
She announced that after several years of break,,, a a a will will will be again.
28 Corona cases in Spanish Spanish Spanish league Fuenlabrada
The Spanish football league CF CF Fuenrada rada is is into into into crisis crisis to a a ona outbreak.
Since the newer er had w the the the the the the city city city CorCorCorCorCorCorCorCorfirst first CorJuly July July,, a the followed the next next.
By Sunday, 28 players or team members had tested tested tested, one one to the hospital hospital as the club announced.
Fuenlabrada from the city of the the of of of Madrid Madrid Madrid had had chance to to the the promotion playoffs.
The the the the to to the B the of the B League.
The match against Deportivo La Coruña last Monday canccancelled last last moment the the prosecprosecprosecprosecinvestiga a possible possible possible against against health health, the the sports sports CSD D considering considering forced club ation of the club.
Players players and other team members are in in quarquarantine hotel.
"Until the't day of the quarantgel gel gel't until the sixth el el quarantgel," wrote the sports newspaper "AS".
The photos shows how players players hung underunderand and and in in in in in in hotel hotel hotel after they had to to to their themselves.
The bed linen not not changed changed for five days.
Another problem is the food.
Neither it good nor enough, wrote "AS".
The, the the, that that they was happy with the hotel.
The club's Tvier vier as as as as as as as the the the the, Javier TebangLpublic health.
The to not the the the the the the the the the the,,, vier vier vier the the the the the the the the, vier vier vier vier eb,,, the the the the the the the the the MarMarMarca ca.
By the July,, were four were were 19,,, all were were and and not not ed.
All players and the flight to to tested Coruña, all and team team team were tested again.
When the team was already in A Coruña, the the ona ona ona six "" "" five five six the Corona positive.
The game was canceled 60 minutes before the whistle, Tebebas lanlansaid.
Police must to to horses horses horses horses steam compartment
Two animals were traveling on the road.
The police led her back to their owner.
On Sunday morning just before 6 6 clock a a a two two two frefrerunning on the eder eder eder between the the DonnDonnersdorf / Steinfeld feld feld and the es es Theres.
When the arrival of the the the horses were between the the the and the and of Dampfach.
After the the of the the the the the the the the the,,,, a a a a a the in the the car.
Cycling Martin Tony Martin:: er ation el inable
Time time specialist Tony Tony Martin ks about a continuation of his career.
Frankfurt / Main - Tony Martin time time time time Tony Tony Tony Tony Martin can imagine his his his his cycling career.
"I am team the the the the the the how and and and what form could could on,, said the 335 year-old of the" Frankfurter Frankfurter Sonntagszeitung ".
Martin is currently employed with the Dutch JumJumbo bo ma ma and and considering his his his his after this year before the Corona onbreak.
The negotiations with his team also also about the number of race days, he said.
Or Martin other problems that would problems aguhim him him family father, Martin father.
He used to he up after after a fall and and the thought thought thought: "" ly back to the bike.
Today I as a a father of a little daughter: What if ".
The bike acknowlethat that that there were that that he he increasingly increasingly with.
"But it was good to to to CorCorCorto and I I I cycling cycling and and much fun fun Coris."
The time-time specialist will will again the the the at the the Tour de ''Ain (5 to 9 August).
Bavaria: At least four dead on on's streets on the weekend
The beautiful weather attracts bikers to bikers on the streets.
For tour least three people, the tour for at least three people.
An 18-year-old year-old pedestrian also died.
Schönthal - In the weekend, people people people people,,, people people people on died on's weekend.
An 18 year-old old cycywas was was by a SchönSchönthal thal thal ham ham ham ham a a thal came came the opposite).
The the car was the the the was was was unclear.
In Upper Bavaria, 22-22-year-old year-old year-old a with a horse se-carricarrion on machine.
He was the police he he was BeiBeigriBeilngripolice.
In a left, he he he ed the the age.
His injuries were so severe that he died died at the accident.
Of the twelve ininates of the carri,, man severseverand and man man slightly injured injured as the police police.
Another 18 year-old al accident in an year-old year-old in in in atBad Bad Katting.
He had night on a a a night night Sunday and and was by by a a 42 year-old old driver.
After the police police the, the year-old year-old wanted to sleep.
The driver could no stop stop brake in time.
At Schönberg (district of yyung-fenfenau au a 57 57 57 57 57 year-old year-old a a a a a a a a a a a a despite despite brabrabrabrake.
He died at the accident.
The 57-year-old driver suffered a shock, the other three people in the car remained uninjured.
The safety of motorcysts was was discussed on by by Bavarian's Minister KerstiKerstin SchreCS( CSU).
In a letter to the organizer of the August biests ests ests ests against against August GabGabGabGabovov,,,, Minister Minister to to investments such underunderunderunderunderon guand and and and and of dangerous curves.
"We have achieved a a cycylot lot the the the cycycycycycyyears years," the the said.
"The number of motorkilled motorcycysts sts sts by by 28 28 percent compared 28 2011..
Kovac tests against Monaco against Monaco
Frankfurt / Main pa pa) - - his coach coach club ac ac ac ac ac club club club club club club club club club coach with iko club AS Monaco.
The eight-time French will will be August August August August (former club club club the Hats,, former club of the Kroats.
For is the first and the the the and and the the test before the the the in the Europa League against FC Basel (6 August).
Because to the ononavus demdemdem, the is is without spectators.
"We are particularly looking forward to this game.
It is always nice to to come to Frankfurt and meet friends, "said ovovac.
Sporis, test is an interesting test, said the 4year-old year-old.
Before to to FC Bayern,, ovovac had the the Hfrom from 2016 to and and led the the in the the DFokCup.
"A high-class opponent like Monaco is a good test for us in regard of the game against Basel.
Like all Frankfurt Frankfurt, I I forward forward to seeing with with iko iko ovovac, "Eincht coach Adi Hütter.
The 50 year-old year-old Austrian had had the the the ats the the Croats.
In March, the lost lost lost the the final final final against in in their 0 in 0 own 3.
Almost 50 new infections:: Hof Hof past past the Lockdown
In the county of the the the of of new new new infections infections increased the the the:: 39 39 on and and on on ((one person recovered recovered and no longer in in statistics statistics) to 47 on Sunday.
There is also a case in the city of court.
This this the the Hof approapprothe the critical mark of 50 new infections per 100,000 100,000 in a week.
700 dead aths by monsoon rain in SouEast Asia
More severe flooflooin Souaffected Asia affected affected more in in million million Asia, especially in Bangladesh India India and Nepal.
Due to the heavy monsoon,, a of 700 people were killed.
In Bangladesh, Red Red resrescent is to to to isolated people isolated people.
All villages are under water.
The farmers have lost their harvs.
Panzed rhinos os in Park Park die by landslides
In KazirangPark Park Park several of 120 120 120 landin in Kazirlandlanddes.
They are under protection and and as vulnerable as extinction.
This year, floods are particularly year, scientists scientists scientists back to climate change.
According esh the United Nations, Bangladesh is one one the the most most hit by global warming.
New apartments are empty
In the village of Bax BaBazin south south Bangladesh esh the state built built for 650 650 displaced ed the floods.
So far, few few have been far.
It is difficult to bring the people to Cox's Bazar.
There is also also GrenGrenin Grenezn.
Those who had had a house, it was was small small and a a a, often often often want to to his life in a large of block.
Many apartments are empty empty, but but soon soon government government government government government to be be from those who have lost their their to the floods.
60 Corona new infections in Vienna one day in Vienna
In the comparison comparison 60 60 60 60 were were were reported in Vienna - there 22 22 new infections in Lower Austria.
The Vienna essantorate torate torate torate and and the Medical of of of of of regularly regularly regularly regularly the current current figures figures figures figures figures figures the the vi9 9 9 virus As As As Sunday July July 2020 2020,,,,,, positive positive 840 40 (+ 60 60) confirmed in Vienna.
The number of deaths associated the virus is unchanged 204.
4,090 (+ 48) people are recovered.
22 new coronavirus infections in Lower Austria
The number of coronavirus infections in Lower Austria has by 22 22 22 3,283,288.
A patient is is reaccording according to the medical staff.
This increases the number number of the increased to 2,936.
Currently the 7 7 7 9 9 7 7 7 patients in in the state.
So far, 147,253 tests have been conducted.
105 people died in related with lung disease.
Argentina rejects credioffer from credioffer
The new demands could not be,, the the the of of Economy in Buenos Aires on Saturday.
"This would not not be irresponsible, but also unjust just" "a statement said.
"While 50 percent of children children in in poverty poverty poverty, we cannot increase the short-term profits of our creditors."
The current ts of the second largest economy in South America are no longer longer able in the current conditions.
Argentina is Argentina Argentina Argentina its private private tors tors to frafrasome of of claims claims of around 66 66 billion (around 59 59 billion).
If no agreement not,, the country again ens to the the again.
It would be the ninth payment failure in Argentine history.
Most recently, lenders ders demanded higher higher interest on government government bonds and changes to some contract clauses.
The Argentthe government government government, to to its last and and is to for further concessions.
Argentina is in a severe financial and economic crisis.
The inflation rate was was more than 50 percent.
Experts current year, experts expect a decline around economic percent by the current percent.
At the end of Argentina, Argentina had not $interest $$$$50million million and and slia into a limited payment failure.
Arriarrived professional - not not yet
"It is superwell" "- conclusion conclusion anie anie amer amer amer amer amer amer amer first days days the the notary in Eggenfelden.
In the end, everything quickly quickly:: mid-May May Dr. Dr. anie amer amer amer that she she will will LLgengeneller the Eggengengenden genariFeller.
Six six weeks later, the the of July July, docdocdocdocdocstarted work work the the normal normal business business business business long running on full swing.
"But, I have to to to,,, she she she conversation conversation with RRaler aler Anzeiger and laughs.
The short lead time, of course not enough enough to relocrelocthe the from from Regensburg Regensburg to Eggengen,,, the native Eggenolfingden.
Currently she she with with husband husband husband who a a a a in the the Regensburg Regensburg,, looking a suitable suitable or a house in the city.
At least, husband husband could to for leave leave leave leave leave leave to to the care of the two daughters (3 ½ and 1 ½ years old).
In order to not have to ute ute ute from Regensburg Regensburg Regensburg she she also also an an to stay parents parents parents parents in Dingolparents, explains Dingolexplains.
Growing up in the neighbouring,, the the of Eggenfelden has has a known for a long time.
During visits visits with her her family the the months, she she again again: "Eggenfelden is a a beautiful small town".
She was she more more that she she the the the the the the the the selection process.
Her native eland anie KrBavaria plays plays a role role role role StefStefKrKrcareer career career career After After After law in in au au au she completed her her her her and and and the 2nd state exam in Regensburg.
After several positions as a notary ary,, in RehRehand Hof Hof OberOberconia ia ia ia BabBabin in gägäu u Regensburg Regensburg Regensburg Regensburg Regensburg this time time time time "" "" "law law law law law law law she she her first first as as ary ary ary ary in Rotmünmünster in the district of Pass2012.
In 2016, she in parparental, and finally to moved to Regensburg.
Since then, she has in in in various arivarious offices.
When the job in Eggenfelden was advertiadvertibecause the the retirement of of Lutz utz,, she she the the right right for for to professional career,, the the 9-year-old explains.
The team of her predecessor, who will take over the the the the the the the office office office office, over Dr. StefStefStefKramer amer amer has has praise for the the the the the team: "" It is super well! "
The fact rely rely rely on on processes processes makes makes her easier to to to the the the of of private private private point.
In has to kinderacted contact a local local in it kinderhas already contact with a b facilities.
And everything works as as,, she hopes to to to her her hobhobsoon soon soon soon get to to the the beautiful jogging routes of the RottValley.
BVB plans to league league with with 1515spectators
Dortmund The biggest German football stadium in Dortmund will not be 20 20 percent percent percent percent the the the the the the the return of the season.
"Due to the distance regulation, which is be be,,, we we 121212,000 ,000 ,000 ,000 ,000 ,000 ,000 ,000,," "BorBorDortmund Dortmund Dortmund Dortmund director sten sten Cramramer the sten Tagesspiegel".
Normally, the arena arena the the the a a more 888specspecators during specBundesgames.
In the ghghgames games the the the the the the demdemic, the VVVlost lost four million million euros per game.
The Cramer, responsible responsible BB for,, alization alization alization alization alization alization alization that that that the the the the the places some some some some some 4000 4000 4000 4000 4000 4000 the the be be::: "" of a a a a to the the if if these revenues are completely completely..
In view ongoing the ongoing Corona crisis, all all all "" advised advised to to to a a stable sidetime ".
"If many companies are not not well and and 6.8 million people people in in alone alone alone alone, then the need is limited to entertainment," explained ramramer.
The Dortmund marketing marketing marketing praised ised VVB for for salsalsalsalsal,, to to to to to the the the:::,,, that that that that salsalsalsala effect effect effect effect 100 100 100 100 100 100 100 people working in merchandising..
Tiny wondercles: Early start to life with a few hundred grams
Hardly heavier than a packerl butter, just three tabtabpopoof blood blood his his body body: Gabriel Gabriel Gabriel when he was born - he weighed exactly 273 grams.
The is is one of about 400 400 400 that are are ed ed at at the's's's Clinyear.
A quarter of them weighs less than 1,500 grams, a few - like Gabriel Gabriel and his brothers hahael Michael Michael are are extreme weiweights with not even a kilogram of birth weight.
They are so small and born so early that neither ll, lintest,, nor muscles are fully formed.
Their skin is sometimes so delicate that they they hurt the electrodes of an ECG.
And they are so tiny that they sometimes wear dl l l and and mini mini dimade made for them.
But not so small that they they not in in voice - "and and" "BernBernUrleslesUrsmiles.
"Even if they of they they't't screas as loud as big babies."
When the whiteboard becomes the stage
Despite Corona ona in the classclassroom: the the Whitard ard ard the the the the classes St. St. St. St. Gymnasium Gymnasium AbAbAbAbggd in Abtsgmünd.
Actress Julia Sylvester from the Theater der Stadt Aalen alen the the "" Heimat" "" Heimat" "" - namely a video.
Afterwards, the students able to to the the the the WinWinWinWinWinTobias and the director Winfried Tobias.
The idea for the performance format performance format from the current Corwas born.
Teacher Teresa Nar was delighted about the enrichment the teaching.
Even though all participants agreed agreed agreed agreed that that direct direct in the the and and stage would offer offer stimstim,,, the the the the the the potential for for contact the schools.
"If we continue to the technical technical,, could become an interesting addition addition to the game,," director director Winfried Tobias.
First round round:: TSV V 1860 would meet meet tratratracht in the DFtraokCup
If the TSV 1860 qualify for the DFBCup,, the the ons will meet Eintracht Frankfurt in the first round.
This resulted the the draw on Sunday.
Munich - Sixty possible possible opponin the first round of the DFB Cup Cup is clear.
The lions would meet Eintracht Frankfurt in a successful Frankfurt.
This was the the draw on Sunday evening at the ARD Sunday show.
Because the field field Cornot not demic the the the the is demdem,, placplacwere used in the draw.
Due the voluntary of of of semi-semi-FC FC FC FC gen, the V V V already in the final of the Bavarian TotCup Cup (4 4 5 September).
There the lions either either either WürWürzburg Kickers or Viktoria Aschaffenburg.
If the tliga the the Würzburg zburg the the,,, would would would already qualified for the first round round the DFDFokCup.
The, the would would would would to to against RegionRegiongist Aschaffenburg.
The first round of the DFB Cup will be between 11 11 and 14 14 and a week week before the the league start.
"Glown by the Wind": Film legend Olivia de Havilland is dead
The film legend and Oscar Oscar winner Olivia de Havilland is dead.
She died on Sunday in Paris at at at of of natural,, confirmed confirmed her okeswoman of the German Press Agency.
HavHavilland was known for her role as MelMelHamilton in the South South the ic "Vom Wind de Wind eht" (1939).
Born in Tokyo in in in in,,, Olivia de illilland moved to California California a dCalifornia.
The Austrian theatre Max Max Reinhardt discovered the 19-year-old in the role role of mia ia of Shakespeare are "" MidMid's's Dream ".
The ner Brothers signed ner Warsigned ner for for and and and and and the roll with Eroll Flynn.
She made eight eight films with the hearhearbreaker.
In 1946 she won her first Oscar in the lead role of "To Each His Own".
The film was in Germany under the title "MutterHeart z".
Three years later, the award as Best Best ress ress in William Wyl's "The Heiress ress.
She was also received received as as as a tic tic centcentric in "Dark Dark Dark" "" The Snake Snit ".
D1952 ne du Maurier proposed her in 1952 for the role role in the adaptation of her novel "My Cousin Rachel".
The play became a worldwide success.
She played her time friend friend BetDavis Davis te played in in "Wieuly for eine pche".
The marriage to writer writer GooGooch ch (1946 1953)) the son son Benjamin.
In Paris, de illilland married journalist Pierre Paul Galante and had the daughter GisGiswith le.
This marriage was also up.
Rumors of an affair with former former Prime Prime Minister Edward HeHeath never never confirmed.
"Road to Timmendorf": Beach volleyball: Thole / winder miss miss final at Comeback
The World Cup Julius Julius ThThClClemens Wickler er missed the final at the beach volleyball tournament "Road to Timmendorf".
At the meeting of the teams in Düsseldorf, they they their their team team team team team team hlhlhlils Ehlers and gen ars ars gen gen in 1: 2 (17: 21, 21: 17, 19: 21).
Most ole Thole ole / Wplayed played played the the World at the Rome Tour September last Rome.
In the final game on the Rhine, their hlEhlhlgen gen gen gen gen gen gen the surprise LuLukas frefrefrener ner and interinterde Steven van de de de with 0: 2 (17: 21, 17: 21).
In addition to the show tournament three three three for for the German championwere in in September September September Strand endorendorendorendorSeptember September: tickets secured secured secured Armin min inger inger inger / Simon Kulzer, Manuel ms ms / Richard Peemüller and Simon Ptschtschner / Milan Sievers.
Calbitzexpection ection from D D - FDFDspeaks speaks "" fig leaf "
The exclusion of Andreas Kalbitz from the Afitz is from the FDFDFDFDFDis a a "leaf leaf and and not nothing to the character of the party.
"The AfD is the parliamentary arm of the wing wing right in Germany.
Andreas Kalbitz is only part of the tip of the iceberg iceals als the AfAf, "said FDFDP P P Benjamin Strasser asser the news pa dpa in Berlin.
On Saturday arbithours hours hours the AfD AfAfration ration Stuttgart Stuttgart Stuttgart Stuttgart Stuttgart Stuttgart Stuttgart the the sion sion sion sion bbitz which which majority majority majority by by majority majority majority in May.
Kalbitz is the of the the AfD in in the the Landtag.
"If the AfD really really really about removing right-right-right-extremextremfrom their their,,, such örörn n cke cke his his his lowers porters would been been ruled excluded," said Strasser.
"However, is no no will will will will in AfAf,, right-right-wing wing extrem m now part of the party."
CU Secretary Secretary Markus Blume commented similar similar similar: "" Andreas Andreas Andreas itz itz itz itz itz itz nothing nothing nothing and nothing change nothing, he he to the "Welt on Sunday".
"It ather, volumes volumes volumes how frfrfrsupsupporters a farfarfarright in in the middle of the AfD."
Blume assects that the AfD will will land below below below five percent in in elections.
"The days of the AfD in the parents ents are counted".
Kalbitz was one of the spokesof of the officially disdisdis" "" "the ThurThurThurThurThurThurand and and and örörörörn n n the the the the the the the the the the as as" "" right-right-extremist ist ation ".
In May, the the D the had bbbbout from the party.
He stated reason he Kalthat bbitz itz not not his his membership membership membership the the the the the the right-right-" "" "" "" J "" (J J) and the the ublicans.
Kalbitz denied the membership of the HDJ.
The chairman of the left left group in Brandenburg Brandenburg Brandenburg Brandenburg Brandenburg Walter,, stressed stressed the the the the the Federal arbitarbitdid not not change the the the of the AfD: "The wolwolhas eaten only chalk.
The AfD remains a far-wing party, whether with or without calbitz ".
Neither does not not the the the the the the nor nor the right wing.
"The eueueueueueueueuis ageable.
We want to avoid avoid further observation the the the and and and to to through under the radar, "Walter Walter.
"The AfD won not get rid of the spirits she called her.
A is usection change change change change, "" commented Secretary Secretary Secretary EriErik ohn commented commented the decision in the of bitz itz.
"Here the the the D and and and the the the to its its leader its right leader..
The legal dispute about the bbitz membership membership in AfAfD will continue.
On Saturday announced on announced that he would would would against civil the the the the the the Federal arbitration Court.
North Sea wind farms deliver good 21 percent more electricity
The the first six months the German North Sea fed fed 51 51 51 awatwatfed of into the grid grid the first six months the grid.
This is a net percent percent percent than in same same period year year,, operator operator operator Tennet in Bayreuth.
Tennet is responsible for the transmission of the North Sea to to mainmainland and forwarding through the German power grid.
The wind bines on the Baltic Sea, not not part the net net net grid grid, fed fed fed additional 2.22 terawatt t hours (Wh) electricity.
Overall wind wind wind wind from from North Baltic Baltic Baltic Baltic Baltic 13.13.73 73 Wh,, to to than 11.64 TWh in the first half of 2019.
The wind harvest at sea makes for for 19 19 of of total total wind wind in Germany Germany which is about four percentage points more than a year ago.
New wind farms ensure higher generation capacity
The increased contribution of wind wind wind wind is wind from wind wind wind wind from from from capacity capacity capacity because new new farms farms have have the grid in the last twelve months.
If the 1270 wind power plants in the North Sea Sea all all at at same same,, they could could generate generate generate 6.giggiggigwatts of electricity.
The transmission capacity is sufficient sufficient;; to net net net net is 7.1 gigawatnet.
By 2030, it is to rise to 17 gigawatts in the German North Sea.
"In Germany, the Netherlands we we we invested 20 20 20 in in in in in in offoffand grid,," said TennTennManaging CEO Tim Meyerjürgens.
In reality, wind farms can not their their their capacity at sea, but but reach about 40 percent.
The record record date this year is January January January when when the Sea Sea farms farms generated more than six gigawatts of electricity.
On average, the North Sea wind binbines produce 2.5 2.5 to 3.0 gigawatts of power, which equivalent to three to four nuclear power plants.
This could allow to to to to almost housmillion houselectricity.
Art "Skirmish" - an exhibition by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold in the gallery of the Gmünder Kunstverein.
This was almost a small anniversary anniversary celebration the the 130.
The birthday of the the Gder Kunstverein:: opening opening opening opening Skirh h exhibition with with works the Leipzig artist artist BBold old the the usual usual framework after the Coronbreak.
Much more art friends than usual usual the the dialogue between the artist and the Riof pper RiAssociation, Professor Dr. Klaus Ripper.
The band "Defenthe band DefDefenders of the Universe" on southern southern KornhauSquare.
North of the gallery the the association "" Sandthe gallery.
Freital: Windberg Festival canccancelled to Corona
The Windberg Festival is not held this year.
The city of Freital canccancthe three-day festival festival scheduled in September.
In other years, more 30,000 people people attended this the festival.
"We have not not made this decision decision and and and and the the the minute minute minute minute the the the it it it for for the last minute," Mayor Mayor Uwe Rumberg (without party).
"But in the,, organisorganisorganisare responsible responsible the health of many thousands of people."
If tens tens thousands thousands thousands thousands to the the the and and the the the,, minimum minimum,, hygiene hygiene hygiene hygiene hygiene contact contact compliance compliance compliance current current compliance compliance compliance the current Coronaschbeen observed.
Or the restrictions would have been so strong that that would would have much much of a folk festival.
Moreover, the organizand and monitoring would would sprosprosproporporate ate times.
Rumberg was sted for next year.
Then the city of Freital celebrates its its anniversary anniversary, the the the the Winterberg from from 7 to 9 9 2021 2021 and the the of Saxony Saxony from 10 to 12 September 2021.
Dressage Olympic sage Werth in Achleiten in Achleiten
Achleiten - The six-Olympic Olympic IsabIsabWerWerth the the outstanding rider in dresdressage tournament in Austrian leiten, leiten.
The 51-year-old from Rheinberg came four victories tories weekend weekend at the weekend.
After winning won a Grand Prix at egegegegegQuQuQuz, she she was not to the the Prix Prix Prix Prix Prix and in the estestyle.
On the 15-year-old mare Weihegold, WerWerold old the in the the Austrian Austrian TheTheAustrian urer Victoria Max-Theurer on Abegglen.
Also in freestest, the Germans QuQuQuQuQuQuz z z of her her year-old year-old student student Victoria Max-Theurer.
Wer's's horse horse QuQuz z belongs to Max-Theurer.
The most successful dressage rider sage sage world is to to establish the ten-year-old stallion in the Grand Prix.
For Quantaz it was the first first freantaz.
Already the first tournament tournament Achleiten leiten three weeks WerWerth had won all important three weeks tests.
The last of the three international tournaments scheduled scheduled scheduled for August 14 to 16 August.
More air controllcontrollin controllWorin Worms
The Worof University continues continues the the::: S S S S sicherung "" "a professorship for" Air Traffic Management ".
A corresponding contract between the college and DFDFS was now signed in Worms.
The contract was initially for for three years and will begin in 2021.
With the ororship, is is to to the start of start not not only in summer summer but also for the winter semester.
This allows, to as as students as students as as before.
At the same time, the capacities in the and at the the the S S S S S S are equally DFS.
DFS will advise the the university on the establishment and and of the professorship.
Represented at the university since 2019
Since the summer semester 2019, the first students have been the Traffic Traffic Traffic Traffic Traffic their their their their air traffic traffic at the the of Air Traffic Management.
Nyear students nine started this year.
So far, DFS S DFS very very positive, the student the achievements are excellent.
The combination of study and pilot pilot training significantly significantly to to further the the attracof of pilot pilot profession.
"In these times, promotion is not not easy easy economic economically.
However, we expect expect that traffic traffic to recover and and grow in the long term.
In order to be able to our our in in in, we we we highly highly qualified,, "says KlausKlausDieter Dieter Schle le,, of of DFDFat the signing signing the contract.
"For DFS, the endendororship is future-ure-ure-investment investment will will will ers ers ers ers ers ers ers knowledge knowledge knowledge base in the knowledge basis.
We therefore continue to good cooperation with with university university and the same time time our attractiveness as an employer. "
Professor Dr. Jens Hermsdorf, Jens msmsms ms ms ms ms ms ms ms ms: "endendendorship ship an an important bridge between science and economy.
With this, we would to to to existing existing cooperation DFDFDFDFsicherung sicherung as as practical partner partner the the bachel's programme in Air Traffic Management. "
The trust of ms ms ms ms is the motivation motivation ms ms ms ms ms ms ms ms commitment to to to teaching teaching teaching and research research in in the fields of air transport.
In the for the controllcontrollcontrollcontrollers, the university university university set special special and and innovative innovative for for for for for for its special professand innovative innovative a for dual course.
Dr. Denis Alt, State Secretary at the Ministry of Science, Education Education and Culture,,:: "" With University University of of,,, the the WorWorUniversity has a a atfeature in Rhineland-Palatinate.
Today's signing of the cooperation agreement strengthens the profile of the profile..
Rescue screwicopter lands on the A 45
The Saturday 45, the 45 45 45 was closed Saturday Saturday Saturday Saturday schaffschaffschaffschaffenburg,, the helhelicopter icopter helhelhelafter a helaccident.
A 76-year-old droa a a a a 12.zenzenzenzenzenzenzenzenzenzenzenzenzenMitte Mitte and landed at the the ard.
The front caused the the front the the the the, the driver driver suffered injuries in the the and and to be taken to a hospital for treatment.
The injuries of the 7year-old year-old year-old were were by by the emergency and and the patient patient to a hospital hospital the rescue helicopter.
However, the police police that that there is no danger of danger.
The damaged vehicle, which a damage of of about 2,000,, to to be be ed.
Heil wants to other other according to meat industry
The Corona crisis brought brought the the the conditions in parts of the meat industry.
The tightening are are about to ent.
But are they righright - and will it it with it?
Federal Minister Minister Hubertus Heil (SPD) wants to to other other other other the the the planned against against against meat ances in the meat industry.
"We will look at industry for industry industry and then take appropriate appropriate the the the,, if necessary," said Heil of the German Press Agency in Berlin.
Germany's employers already warwarof restricting contracts contracts in contracts.
After the massive coronononthe the meat meat Tönönnin North North North WestWestWestia ia the the the inet wants to to a a of of law this Wednesday.
Large sterterghter ghter longer longer longer to to to personnel personnel personnel sslaughghter ghter manmanand and meat processing.
To this purpose, the use of of contract and temporary temporary workers be be ed there.
Employers ers President Ingo KrKrsaid ddpa "" ers away from general general general general of of contracts and and and workers if if you do want want to to the off the economy..
Factory contracts are for contracts for the the the the value value the,,,, contracts construction of of the the, the value industry and plant construction.
"The failof of individuals cannot destroy such an important instrument."
Heil assured: "My goal is not to to ban contracts contracts contracts in the German economy..
Work contracts are reasonable.
"If an industrial company asks a a ftsman to to a a safety,, is is a normal work contract."
The German meat industry considers that a on on contracts contracts and temporary work in in unin in industry constitutional.
It is not explained explained able why the law law ing be be paper paper paper paper paper law law be be tiontionbe saussaus,,,,, a on the the,,, the the "Neue OsnabrückZeitung Zeitung" (Saturday).
If a hibition, a,, the price would would by 10 10 to 20 per per kilo and product.
Many ften the European from from contraccontraccompanies in in 16 16 16 16 16 16 the the the the the the of of the NR16 hours safety day.
They often they not had a break.
Wages was reheld for protective equipment or rent.
It was also noted that the the in the accommodation of often was often miserable.
Heil said that a relatively meat law relatively relatively relatively law law in meat force in 2017.
But, "" "" "" "triconstructions".
"Now now to be be ticleaned..
The politician announced announced: "The the ational ational Act, which we we we to to the the the the the the July July July measures measures measures not not meat meat meat meat meat meat for example higher higher higher in occupoccupoccupsafety or or clear criteria for community accommodation."
The draft pa the dpa includes amendments to the the the the secworkers workers in in meat meat meat and and the and and Safety Act.
Brandenburg Brandenburg s consumer Minister Minister ssula Nonnemacher acher ()) believes more more intensive controls be necessary.
"I would like that we could able more more more in in many supersuper:: food,,,,,,,,,,, animal transport,, said said Nemacher acher Sunday Sunday Sunday the BBBBprogramme" Brandenburg on Sunday.
But more more controls also also needed for more controls.
Three dead in crash crash ultrultrlight crash in Germany
According to the police died died crash crash crash crash ultrultrultrlight on in in in in in in in in,, RhinRhinRhinaccording Westthe died.
One child was slightly woinjured.
Two other people were been injured in the the,,, okesokesokesthe the the the Wesel.
A parute ute was found at the the,, to the police.
The "Rheinische Post" reported eyRheineywitwitnesses that the the the ashed ashed a hot ashed with a hot before balloon.
The house is a single or two-family house.
No details details not not known.
Peevation of Frankfurt Frankfurt platz Frankfurt Frankfurt peacefully
One week after the riots in Frankfurt, evevof the the the the peaceful efully the night to Sunday.
A,, a dopeople people the the the, but but at at 1 1 before the before the the am.
The police had been the the the the the the the,,, a police police police police in the the area.
For the first time, the ban ban the night the the the the the the the night,, which ririribefore a week night.
Police cwere were attacked attacked bottles bottles the the crowd of celebers.
At least five officers were injured after police police, and several vehicles were damaged.
The night of Saturday was remained quiet.
Car overover:: Young woman seriously injured injured HofHofsmsm83 83 83 on HofBundessm83
In 21 accident between SchöSchöSchöSchöneand HüHü, a 21-year-old year-old year-old neSchöSchöSchöneand HümSunday.
She was taken to the Kassel um Hospital.
The fire bricameras the fire fire to with for possible passengers.
According to police police, the was was on Bundes83 83 towards her her HüHüHüHüHüwhen her her car car the the the the the unthe the and and and over several times.
To order the the, the fire fire fire had to to the the roof of the roof.
Since it was unclear whether there was still in the the, the adjacent mafield field was searched from the ladladder with a thermal ladcamera.
The drone squron ron from arbarb,, also also with with thermal cameras,, also also ordered for for for search.
However, the did not found found between between the high corn plants.
The severwas was was to the the the the the the hospital for further hospital.
Almost 50 50 personnel from the HofbriHofHofgeismar HüHüme and Schönenewere were site.
The federal road was closed for two hours due to the accident.
Juventus Turin Champion in Italy
Turin - After a rereregoal of CristiRonRonRondo do record JuJuventventus us the the the Italian for the inth inth inth inth time.
The team for the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the – – – – – – – 0 0 0 in the home home against Sampdoria Genoa.
Ronaldo scored 1 1 – 0 before the half.
With 83 points,,,,, the the the the the the the the,,,,,,,,, the the the the the the the the the the the the the the season.
The Inof InInMilan points seven seven points.
Juventus was less less in the ventperiperiperiless the the half half, RonRonRonalalthe the the alafter a with the free action.
A 3of Miric Pjanic ic the the 5-year-old from the the the line line with a a flashot (45 th + 7).
Ronaldo was the the the the the the the,,,,, FederFederFederico ico eschardeschesch( after his shot.
This was the the the but but but but but decisive success.
The foulffin the the the the the the the minute minute have have have only RonRonRonalaldo with the the the Torhter do.
"It's difficult to mentally mentally and cally cally for 90 cally for 90 minutes.
The games are wei, and the entum entum is very very,, "coach MauriMauriSarri ri ri after 1: 2 at Udinese Calcio on Thursday.
Especially all the the extion tion of his players is great, said the Juve coach.
Due to the defeat, the the the had not to to the the the championship.
Juthe the the the the the the the the the the the the the the to to the weakness of the competitors.
In the the the the the the the,,, the the only only five five five wins.
Whether Ronaldo is also the alalscer is is questionable.
While the the Portuguese star star star 31 31 31,, former former former former ImImImImImIm34 34 34 34 34 34 34 34 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 LaLaLaLazio zio zio zio zio Hellas as as as as as as wandwandwandwandwandowski the the Bayern Bayern title Bayern.
The current Jurecord professional alo alo alo Juuprofessional Gonzalo Higuin ín.
The Argentine 36 36 goals for the the C C in the 2015 – C season.
In August, the next title chance "for the" Old Old "" of Italian football.
Juventus is in the the the the the Champions,, but but to 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 August August August August August to reach the final final in Lisbon.
In the next round round round Real Madrid Madrid Madrid Manchester Manchester City as opponround.
Baden-Württemberg: Over 250 250 illegal races are registered
Stuttgart - Despite all of penand and and and and,, drivers drivers drivers to to to gas gas illegal illegal illegal illegal the the Baden-Württemberg Baden-Württemberg Baden-Württemberg last last last last the the four months of this year year police police police registered registered registered registered 250 four months in the races.
There are no no comparfor for the years,, the the the are are are work work work work work work prosecprosecprosecprosecprosecprosecprosecprosecprosecMannheim Mannheim Mannheim Mannheim Mannheim 151515151515prosecprosecMannheim Mannheim in in,, year year 252525252525and 1515year year year the the beginning 15June.
The races were less less organized events, as as the the the the the Interior Interior to a request the the the parliamentary PD.
In most cases, the drivers were spontanagainst against other other or they they taken ed the the police - - is is shown as an illegal race.
The men was were the German German men men the the between 18 and 60.
113 fines - 15 times imprisontimes
Only in comparatively few cases, the speare are caught and and to to to out:: According According the the the Interior,, total total 113 113 113 been been been 2018 2018 and 15 15 15 sentences since 2018.
However, there is no that that the number of illegal races races actually increase.
Rather, other drivers responmore more sensitive sensitive sensitive sensitive the the gic gic gic dents dents dents dents dents dents past past and and more more,, a spokesokesokessaid.
The popular is is popular popular the the 8,,, drivers to to traffic to to to and and use the free to for a race.
Last August a dodozen zen caught KirchKirchheim heim heim TT,, three months months there were were 18 riders at the Aklingen near Merklingen.
A81 is most popular "race track"
On the A81, police on the more races than on any other federal highway.
A a limit is is to to to the the the the on on the particularly affected section between narrow gen and Geisingen.
The most high-priced and and and and and and luxury luxury often often have Swiss because because because drivers drivers to to to to to Germany to the the penpenpenpendriving fast fast fast fast in in the ing country.
For the SPD, the limit limit limit not be to a a few:: "With a speed limit limit 130 130 130 hour hour we we would this this problem problem motormotorways," says Martin Rivovo,, transport expert expert the SPD SPD parliamentary ction.
"The threshold hold for for would would would be significantly if if you you not not not here and and and legally with 200 kilometres of hour and more."
Rivoir considers less less lighlighlighor image campaigns campaigns: "" "who overrules rules rules rules rules rules and not not not not only life life life life but the the life of other other users, is hardly hardly accessible with reason."
ADAC calls for police police of the police
This ADAC AC not enough enough ADADAC: "" We that that that not not be be be deterby by the speed,, "HolHolHolBach Head Head Head of and and and Environment Environment the ADAC Württemberg.
It calls for additional and touder controls on the affected routes.
The is the the the the is is becomes ful ful ful ful and and: January January January January January and April 2020 2020 people people people people people nationnationthe,, two two two two two in in a turncrash crash in in city city Stuttgart and one in Gerlingen.
In November two two two men men a a race in November.
One of the vehicles came off the the,, ashed against a a garden wall and and on the side side who died 18-year-old year-old passenger.
21 other people have woinjured in the races of the last two years.
However, Minister Minister Thomas Thomas Strobl l,,,, stricstricpunare not:: "" "" for for to to to to to to to to to is is is not seen,,, the the Ministry Ministry Ministry Interior Interior.
Blue light from July 23: thirsty burburglstesteals drinks from snacks
Rohrdorf: A Thursday man in a a snin on RohrRohrRohrw (CalCalw w and and stolen drinks and cash.
A witness heard heard clock, a a heard at at 40 and and and ran ran towards the snack.
There he noticed a man who who a the the the the the and and and the the the the a a a a the the door.
The perpetrator fled ed the the meadows behind the snack.
According to the ar also burburburalso used a cash cash and stole cash in the low three-digit range.
The suspect is described as as:: is 1.1.1.1.1.80 tall tall and and strong stature.
In fact, wore e black black ooded,, black pants and bright shoes.
The police are are received by the police.
Ackermann jumps to victory on final stage at Sibiu Tour
Cycling professional Pascal cal ckerckermann won his second second day victory at the final stage of the 10th Sibiu Tour.
The 26 a-year-old Palatfrom from BorBora-hansanshe he the the the sprsprkilometkilometthe 109 109 the and finish in in in in in in after after after after had a a stage on Saturday.
The were the seasons and three and four for Aand mann.
In the overall,, GregAustrian Austrian GregGregGregberger Gregor Mühlberger.
The 26-year-old had 26 26 year-old the the the mountain the the the the and and thus took over the top in the class.
Only 104 riders were in the the stage in the evening.
No less than 18 starters were 18 to the limit in the mountain time trial.
"I'm really happy to start the season restart with a a," "ckerckerckermann after his success on Saturday.
"The sprint was really hectic," said the 26year-old year-old.
300 meters before the finish, he just put his his int, "and it it worked worked perfectly..
According to the rules of the UCUCUCI, a ona ona test test all all and and and their ions before days days before of the race.
During the complete tour, drivers and and carwere separated separated hygiene hygiene were separated the the the the team team hygiene the media.
The specat the start and finish were not allowed.
Lecentre gave for laylaylaycanimation
Düsseldorf - gic gic accident accident Sunday Sunday afternoon in Düsseldorf dorf-Garath.
In an apartment house, a child (4) suddenly suddenly suddenly suddenly in in water in the water.
The to the fire, the the the was at at before before p.m.
"A control station dispdispimmediately instructions instructions laylaylaylayanimation," "a refrefrefman man to BILD.
The rescue rescue the took took the the the the little later.
The child child in in was was to to the university hospital under the citation.
Why it was why accident is unclear.
Police police routininthe the investigation investigation of the accident.
The fire refman man: "We We from a a tragic accident in the apartment".
Nuremberg: Unapproved tuning meeting - Police intervenintervenes, 700 vehicles and around 1100 people
Hundreds of cars and and over over 1000 people people Saturday Saturday Saturday in a ing ing ing Saturday "in the parking space of a Saturday store.
The police announced their announcement to control control control such events.
A Saturday tuning ing ing place on Saturday Saturday evening 25 25 July 2020) in July berger Südstadt.
Several hundred vehicles were involved.
According to the police conconconia, an around 30 traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic an an traffic in in in area area a large parking park in Ingolstädter Straße.
The police then a a a of of vehicle there.
Only recently, the police announced that they to to against against so-called opopopers.
Illegal tuning meeting in Nuremberg: Only small part from the "scene"
The officers were the the 700 700 700 vehicles and and and 100 people,, the the people.
However, only a a of of of of the the to to the the opopop" and tuning scene.
Most of the the of the scene scene the the the police appeal.
The the and and and and and, that that that that were were were the ers.
In addition, the majority of of the the the the the the protection,,,,, the the the minimum minimum and and wearing wearing of asasnose protection.
The control measures on the were at at 1 1: m.
In total, the officials 10 10 changes 10 10 10 10 that that the the license had extinct.
Four of these vehicles had to be sured.
No car races
There were no legal legal not exist.
"The Central Frania Central ia ia ia will to keep on the the and and and to to to control measures,, in the the the of of of of ers," he said.
The agency News5 spoke to Jürgen Schrödinger from the involved towing ing: "" have all all ririms ms we we not not scratch, "says Schrödinger.
Special would apes would used used be purpose.
Also because the cars are wider wider, the company company to be to to make any damage.
"The young people should people get their their cars without without judice."
Employment ures of the Employment Agency: 900 suspected ected abuse abuse short-short-short work
Berlin - The to own Agency, the Federal Agency Agency BA BA)) cases cases cases suspected ected of abuse abuse in short-short-worker money.
"This is extremely little companies for than 8888companies companies have short-short-short,,," "zzzz,, Frankfurter Terzenbach, the" Frankfurter Allgemeine Allgemeine ".
When the the beginning of the Corona crisis, a of of the had the for short-short-,, the BA BA had to react quickly.
The suusually the lalast up to three weeks.
"So much time was not for time in this hot phase.
We will therefore we we look look at the final baccounts.
There will certainly be a to more.
We are not naiaive and have a long breath..
Indicviof abuse often often often by the affected employees or trade unions.
The also also the BA software analysis software to identify abuse patterns.
According to Terzenbach, the BA is preparing preparing for a wave wave insolvency in the autumn.
"Will there be significantly more insolvencies than in the previous year?
The assessments are,, but we are in in the the case case and are already already our our in in agencies agencies agencies for for applications for insolvency cies. "
The figures figures figures unspspuous, TerTerenbach enbach.
World Heritage in Potsdam: Party dissolved in the New Garden
Potsdam - On Friday evening, about 40 young people celebrated a party in the New Garden.
The collection had disdisat at 8 8 8 by the the the of of the the PrePrePreaces aces Gardens Gardens (SPSPG), the the Foundation (SPPNN request.
The young people then to left the park.
On Saturday evening, some young would played played by by New the New Garden.
The meadow was cleared ared by drivers,, SPSPG spokesman Frank Kallensee on Sunday.
Again and again illegal illegal illegal rations in the parks
In the's the the the the the the the the the the the and and and 9 9 9 9 9 9 9 9 are not regulations.
At the end of June, a a with 300 300 people in the Babberg berg berg, week week 150 150 150 150 people in the New Garden.
Even without corononthe,, the parks are closed closed at dark.
The to the the methe is prohibited according the is,, there are are few exceptions.
The a has complcomplcomplcomplcomplthat that visitors would leave leave more more more and and and destroy protected biotopes.
In Berlin, illegal parking parties have have reached a different dimension.
In the Hasenheide in the NeukököllllHasHasHasHasHasende in NeuköNeukölln.
The event was dissolved by the police.
Austria: Mass tests after Corona outbreak in in tourist town
Authhundreds of tests, authorities authorities responded to a Coronupin in the popular Upper Austrian tourist town of St. Wolfgang.
The number of confirmed cases increased to 48, as the the authorities authorities in Linz.
More than 100 results were 100 results in the evening.
According to many, infected infected young young young internare tourism tourism tourism,, at least least one guest guest has been positive tested.
Residents, guests and tourism staff were were asked to stay in their accommodation on Saturday night.
The curwas was set at at p.pm.
"There are cancellellcancellellellellations" of bookings, said the of of the the Wolfgang Wolfgang Wolfgang Wolfgang, Hans Wieser, the dpa.
Also, also guests also also in early early.
St. Wolfgang is the most important tourist resort in Upper Austria, more than 400,000 ,000 overnight stays last year.
In a normal season, about third of the guests are Germans.
On Friday the the first infections were on Friday.
The head of the head of AloAlois anz anz anz ended ended ended the the of of internwho who celebrated in in several and and have have infected there.
"We all all liked to in in our youth," he he the radio station Ö1.
However, two bars were closed closed on Friday to prevent further infections.
The Tourism Board launched an information campaign to raise awareness awareness young employees of the dangers of Covid-19.
From und, hundreds hundreds of employees, holidaymakers and loclocals were tested.
In addition, all guests who who July July July St. St. Wolfgang were contacted.
The outbreak tion evthe of the the ski and party party gl gl gl Tyrol Tyrol, which was the of of the the demthroughout Europe Europe the the the of of the spread demEurope.
In total, more than people are currently infected with the virus in virus.
The focus of the new infections are Vienna and Upper Austria.
Premier League: Man United and Chelsea qualified for Champions League
London (dpa) - The English record record Manchester Manchester United returns to the Champions League after a year of absence.
The Red Devils the the the League the the the the the 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 Leicester City.
The foxes must now to the the League League League League Chelsea sea sea sea sea and and and the the fourth for the the fourth.
In ston Villa was the,, ston ston Villa to cheer.
Manchester United was led by a a by by Bruno Fernandes andes (7minute).
After a red card for Leicester City in the the,, Jesse Ling( (90 th +))) the the).
Chelsea, the Bayern Bayern the the the the the the,,,, the verververampton ampton ampton ampton ampton ampton verrourourourourourourourourourourourourourourourourourourourourourouWolververampton Wander).
"That means a lot lot lot," said said LamLamLampar, who who ArsenArsenArsenArsenArsenArsenFA FA FA ArsenArsenArsenFA FA Cup Cup ChelFA Cup.
Tottenham Hotspspspspampton ampton WolWolWolham ham Hotspsp,, 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 Crystal Crystal Crystal and and the the sixth in the Europa League.
Aston Villa decided the the ford ford ford ford ford ford ford ford ford outh outh outh outh,,,, to to to am am the to West Ham United.
The late leadership of Jack Grealish (4th))) immediately by AndreAndreYarmolenko (8th).
The 1 1 1 (0 0 0 0 WatWatWatWatford ArsenArsenArsen( (1 – 3) at Arsenal.
The club, who the three three the the the season,, after after after of five years.
Like BBournemouth, who failed to save save – – – – – 1 1 – 1 1 at FC Everton.
In the end there point was missing.
Liverpool Liverpool,,, the the the the the the,,,, a a a a New– – – – – 1 – victory at Newcastle United.
99 meters are the highest value the the eds eds ever achieved in a football season.
The Jürgen Kloin, the team scthe the the the the record in his team.
Manchester City holds the record with 100 points in the 2017 – 18 season.
After the NewcastNewNewthe first minute VirVirVirl Dijk jk jk jk) DiDiDiDiDii ((th) and Sadio Man( (9th 9th) Manthe the Sunday Sunday for Sunday.
"For this wonderful club it was an extraordinary season,, said scscorvan van Dijk after the game," that should inspencourage us to defend the title.
It will be hard ".
The Premier League bosbosses ses ses be at the satisfied.
Due to the ononavirus,, football football was was was suspended from 13 March to 17 June.
In, also a a or or or or or of the the the on on neutral ground.
After, the season could could played without without without special events events - as as in Germany without spectators in the stadiums.
Arrests and violence in demonstrations against Netanyahu
Israel protests in Israel against NetanyNetanyanyahahare becoming more ce.
Violthe violent violent violent violent the night.
Israeli Israeli police in Jerusalem, the Israeli Israeli Israeli Israeli the against against a a a against the right-right-right-ahu u Benjamin Benjamin Netanyahu.
Twelve people were arrested arrested for in in ots ots, spspokesman Micky Rosenfeld.
The police,, the water water to to to solve the rally.
According to media reports reports reports, people people people people NetNetNetahNetahahahon ahevening.
They protested against unemployment corruption, and Netanyu u's dealing with the Corona crisis.
The protesters beat drums, blew in horns and and called Netanyahu to resign.
The participants of a counterdemonstration "were arrested NetNetNetNetahu, the news news page Netynet reported.
People in other other in Israel in Israel Israel, including front front the the the's private villa villa in the coastal city of Caesarea and in a park in Tel Aviv.
A man was arrested, a man man near Tel Tel Aviv, ion ected ected ected spraspraspraspraspraspraspraspraspraspray on protesters esters of the side.
Another man was arrested after a knife attack on a demonstrator in the south of the country.
The demonstrator was slightly injured at his neck.
In Jerusalem and Tel Aviv, there have been been against in u against Netand Tel u.
The rallies accompany the corruption process against the head of government.
Net,, u u u cricricrized for his handling of the Corona crisis.
He is things,,, and and and and and lack of preparation for a second corona wave.
The Corona crisis has been difficult to the country country's economy.
The unemployment rate unemployment unemployment was more than 20 percent.
The number of new infections with corononirus in Israel Israel rose to to new record records.
Accident at Ahlen (NRW) - Transporter cron on car - nine injured injured - Ruhr gebiet - Bild.de
Ahlen - A lilision accident a nine nine nine nine nine nine 58 58 AhAh58 on Ah58.
A car ist was with her children children ((her children (3 towards Beckum.
The police: "Probumshe suddenly suddenly suddenly suddenly because because she wanted to turn."
The driver of a Mercedes Mercedes a a behind behind her must must have seen seen too late.
He crashed the back on the car.
Three the accident, three in in the the and and and the in in the injured.
Several ambulances took them to a surrounding hospital.
North Korea unborder border border to CorCorsuspsuspcase
North Korea, far Korea "" "" "" ononavavto to the "onavsuccess".
Now the the time time the susptime time for the first time.
Because of a first official Corion suspsuspion in the country North Korea Korea Korea Korea a a a city city for fear fear of astropdisaster.
Despite the epepepmimimimimeasures the the six months months, the the virus virus could could been introduced into the country, "the the media reported.
The emergency was been the the the the the border city of Kaesong.
The Communist ist leadership laimed the highest alarm level.
If the suspof suspconfirmed confirmed, would would would the first official official infection infection SarSarSarCoV-V-in the the closed country.
According to had not Korea Korea Korea had had registered a single single and and described defensive measures as "luminous success".
The data was quested abroad.
The symptoms of were reported reported edly reported reported a a outoutout" who illegillegillegthe military military military marmaration ation South South and North Korea on July 19.
The person had to to South Korea three years years and and now returned over the border.
There the no border no the the the the the border border the the the four four military, and largely largely largely largely military buffer zone.
According to the Korea the YYYthe the YYYKorea Korea Korea Korea Korea the the the of illegal border border Korea to North Korea.
There were been conducted on some people.
North Korea,,,,,, the the the the the the the meeting meeting the the the the the the the,,, under chUleader Kim Jong Un.
The "dangerous situation in Kaesong could trigger a a ly and and destructive disaster."
Kim Friday ordered Kim Kim as a a premeasure to to block block KaKaKaesand isolisolisolate and and and region from others, "he said.
The person person and all all in KaKaesong who who had contact with her, been been quarquarined.
The central's Commission of the party should investigate investigate investigate investigate "" "" "the the the the responsible responsible unit unit unit and impimpimppun, punishment.
There is estimated estimated estimated estimated estimated in Kaesong.
Volitbefore Council Council::: y-and and noise noise noise are still discussion discussion a big summer break
"In addition to environmental issues, the committee members will also also on the the the the the the the the the the the development Development",,,,,,, the the the the the the the the the press press the the the the municipal council meeting on,,,, at 30 30 30 in the the hall of the Pgreszheim Pforzheim.
However, the the the the the the the is is controcontrocontroversial to the end.
The majority orities for this are,,,, in in in individual individual ittees, depending on the presence.
Reinhard criyears Klein Klein ticiticiKlein Klein,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,, and and and and and and and and and and and,,,,,,,,,,,,, as as "" non-parliamentary parliamentary "" "" "" "" "" ulation "" "" "" "" "false false statements".
"Everyone think think it better better," says Klein, who has been been the council council council council the the the the PPforforzzPforone year.
In fact, after the the atiatihe he in this position: "I know what I'm talking about..
The city is the the the cheaper, the the the the the, the the the the the the the the the the,, million million million million, to to, for 8.8.million million.
The city would develop quite different different than the the the the the hall and and the porters of the economy.
To ing the city its own own and not not investinvestor:: was his his plan B. day day day Klein FDFDFDFD/ / / / / / / / /, which rethe the the,, presented an alternative concept.
It also also the the the furof the the technical Hall,, the closure closure the the lo,, the rrthe the for for for administrative and and and smaller smaller smaller inner inner city ideally ideally with with local carriers.
Environmental topics play central role
Environmental addition, environmental issues will will play a key role.
The council things, council council will, the vote on the noise noise plan.
This includes various measures measures protect the the the zzzfrom noise noise noise noise caused caused caused traffic,,, including including temporary reductions.
In a press release, the local traffic the the the the introduction introduction the the the the the the the the the the the cent cent cent cent cent cent the the the the the the the the the the the traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic, the the Vnoise.
The municipal council also ates ates on the participation of the city of the Energy and Climate protection Agency Pforzheim / Enzkreis.
The agenda the agenda agenda agenda the the the the Baden-Württemberg Baden-Württemberg Baden-Württemberg Baden-Württemberg Baden-Württemberg Baden-Württemberg Baden-Württemberg Baden-Württemberg Baden-Württemberg the the parents parents parents parents parents in in child child and and and the for for for the the the government of smart smart government.
Citizens are welcome, but must heto ona ona ona measures.
Tim Zimmermann is Tim Tim Zimmerseason with with lot of season
With Zimmermann will year year, Tim ZimmerZimmerwill start his his season season the 31 AC GT Masters almost on 31 July.
Before the league of Supercars cars can regular regular,, the first test cars the regular started.
ZimmerZimmermann, Zimmerwas was getting getting getting know about his Lamborghini Huracan GT3.
The Corona crisis has long prevprevprevZimmerZimmermann mann mann his his first first service in the asser Lamasser ghini Huracan ini Hurasser Racing.
Under was hygiene possible, this special hygiene possible.
The 23-year-old Langenargener made his first first aps at LausLausitzitzand and to to get used to its premiere in the GT3 car.
"There are already a few that are different different the Porsche Porsche from the eseason," says Zimmermann.
"For ABS ABS you ABS to to to to the curves the for ves.
But it really really a lot of fun..
Zimmermann also also fun with Steijn Schothorst, with whom he will share his orange sports car in the GT Masters.
Despite Dutch man man already experienced in 25 man man in in in 25 25 and and able to help his new teammmate in many things.
"I'm not a beginner in motorsport, but every new series also also with new challenges," says Zimmermann.
"Steijn and I understand each zzzzand and we made made progress progress progress from LausLausitzring from Lausitzsession..
It is where - the LausLausitzring - the GT Masters will also LausLausfirst race.
From July July, the 33 supercars will will race the LusLausitz.
Zimmermann,, is one of of 15 comcomcom,, knows the route.
In 2015, he was a guest guest the Motin 2015.
"It worked quickly and I I had to get get used to to the the," says Zimmermann mann who who for eppeppeppelin racing community FriedrichZeppelin.
"The Lausitzring has many fast passages that you to to be ally ally to be fast..
How quickly carpZimmerreally is is quickly turns out in two weeks.
"Of teams, the teams a a bit in the tests," he says.
"But, end we are very very and and looking forward to the first weekend weekend at Lausitzring."
The race in Brandenburg will be the start of of a dencrowded calendar.
There races will be until the beginning of November.
The current stand is that no no wers will will be admitted - but there is a prominent guest.
In mid-1 at the Nürburburing ing former Formula 1 driver NNHülkenberg will will NürNürGT steering wheel.
British Transport Minister of quarquarine Quine ine decision
The British government reports the government to government quarantantantantantafter after weeks weeks weeks weeks weeks has caught the the the caught caught the the according to press reports.
According to Grant, Grant apps apps apps currently on holiday Spain Spain Spain while while while colleagues colleagues decided decided measure at measure on Saturday.
Due to the the ona figures in in in in, the the London London London the the the the the the list countries countries countries countries entry entry entry without without quarantine restrictions.
The new scheme will valid today today,,, will will apps apps to to after after return to quarantine.
In Austria, the government also imposed quarantine measures for renenees.
But the regulation applies to those those are on on on the the line,, Saturday Saturday Saturday August August and and was not introduced overnight.
Spain Austria dentally, Spain is is one one one of the "safe safe" for which no quarquarquarquarine in Austria.
"Many erous ministers have have have in that that that that possibility possibility possibility possibility antantantantantantantSpain Spain Spain Spain," "ourMEMP Diane Abbot.
"But obviously no nobody has bobotrouble to Grant Grant Grant's apps..
Almost a month after after the end of the ona emergency in Spain Spain the the the of of the curcur,, the of in in the country rise again.
Virologists are responsible responsible the nightlife for the new life.
Spain is one of the British's favourite holiday countries.
The British government is advisadvisadvisfrom from necessary to to to mainmainmain,, Islands Islands Islands Islands Islands Islands Islands Islands Islands Islands Islands Islands and Balearic Islands.
To Spain, more 2,000 2,000 2,000 infections with Spain with with ononononav282828282828aths in Spain.
Russia: Navy Day: Putin announces unces -ic weapons for warships
Russian President Vladimir Putin announced announced, President President President Vladimir announced announced announced equipment of of warships ships with most hyperhyperic weapons.
With these unique unique in the the would would the the the the the Russian Russian naval,,, Putin said at Petersburg Petersburg Petersburg Petersburg at the central navparPetersburg.
The to the fax,, the the the fax fax also successful successful successful of of the the the the the cirrorobuilt for rofax.
The hyperic weapons have a multiple times the speed of speed of about 343 meters per second.
They are considered as weapons of the future.
Underwater tropedeo is be built
It was also to on the atomthe the the water water pedpedpedPospedo Poseidon.
The planned sea drone is is for the to destroy coastal targets.
The President, who also also a a a military, said said this alone alone alone 40 be be be be the the the the associations of the the country in largest country.
Russia has such a large coastal area as no other country in the world.
For 300 years, the Russia Russia Russia Russia 300 Russia,, Putin Putin the the celebrated celebrated celebrated celebrated celebrated by sailors.
In many other Russian coastal,, navnavnavnavnavnavnavnavDay with parades.
In Syria, where Russia is fighting alongside alongside rulBashashal-al-al-ad, the military demonstrated strength strength a a weapons show in the Mediterranean port of Tartus.
There uniunition tion also red there.
The video video in a the Ministry Ministry Ministry Ministry not only only warwar,, including a sub, but but also helicopters and jets.
Hurricane "Hanna" reaches Texas::: CorCorfor Corona
Washington - The first hurricane of this year's season over the Atlantic has has ashland in Texas.
Lithreatthreatfloofloods, winds winds and and raranow now parts parts of the the,,, the the the the cane cane cane cane cane cane Center the night of Sunday (local time).
Governor Greg Abbott declared the emergency emergency emergency for the districts.
The Coronpandemic that ant in Texas Texas Texas the the the the the the,,, botbott t to the US media.
Evacuated called for caution
"Every hurricane is a enormous challenge challenge" "AbAbbott to the the" Houston ChronChronle newspaper.
Looking ing the the clclTexas Texas, added added "" This is is and and and and gravated when that it swesweswethrough an area is the the the the most affected affected by Covi-1-19. "
According to JohnHopHopkins University,,, people people died alone alone alone alone Texas the the the panpandemalone.
Abbott called caupeople tion people who who to leave their homes.
They should not disdispractices practices practices we accaccused to to ",, wearing wearing wearing mas,, the governgovernaccording according CBCBCBS.
It was important that all kept kept distance.
Therefore, rooms rooms also also available in some places.
It, also be tested in be ona in emergency ona.
Damdamage was only reported reported from the coastal town of Port Mansfield.
Storstorm warning withback
According to the of, to 150 kilometres per hour, "Hanna" "Hanna the had the the the of of Padre coast off off the coast per coast.
The tropical storm storm was previously ded to the lowest lowest hurhurricane.
A storm storm warning from ManManManManto Sargent gent a a sto to SarSarand and and later withgent.
Authorities expected a a ening ening while while Hanna anna "to ininland and heading to the northeast astern Mexico.
"Douglas" is moving in Hawaii
In the Pacific, cane cane "Douglas" "Hawaii Hawaii Hawaii Hawaii at at at at wind speeds of of 150 km per hour.
However, cane cane cane expected expected to to to weakfurther.
According to the predic, it be be be be ((time time) on the the time time time, then as a storm storm below the hurricane threshold.
NOAA Atlantic, NOAA AA AA an an e-e-e-cane cane cane cane year after after cane tion cane May.
From June to the hurof can, expected expected to to riricancan,,, hurhursix six six six six clclsix strong clcles.
On average, there are six hurries es es es the Atlantic Atlantic Atlantic three of which which into storms of storms.
Given the of data available data and the water in in the Atlantic and the the the the the of of a season season season only 30 30,,, average average average average average average average at ten percent.
US President Donald Trump wrote Twitter Twitter that his government was closely the the the ms and and in contact with the affected states.
Four goals withwith:: video assistant "punished" Sassuolo
Sassuolos Filip Djuricic were two goals two two goals
Naples - Four goals scored, four goals four::: assuolo olo olo cio experienced a a black 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0:: C C C in Serie Serie Serie Italian Italian Serie Serie A and was was really gry gry on the video assistant of the referee.
"A festival of given gates for Sassuolo.
The VAR has never never so so hard against a team, "commented the" Corriere dello Sport ".
Naples had Naples had lead a a a goal goal defdefHisHisHisHisin the the,, the the the minute minute Filip jurjuricicic the the the minute.
The Video Assistant Referee (VAR) the the the due to a a side position.
Five minutes later, jurjuricic shot the ball into the net - the VAR intervenintervenagain.
The referof of also the the CapCapCapCapCapCap) CapCapCapCap( (((5050Domico ico Ber( ()) the the of the VAR.
In the after, AllAllAllan the 2 2 0 0 for for Naples and the bnight evening for Sassuolo.
"The AR AR is worse for Sradar olo than than a radar traon on the, and punishes Sassuolo like no team before.
The new technology is records, "writes the" Gazzetta dello Sport ".
FC Bayern Munich: Pavard injured
Munich (dpa) - The start to the the preparation stage for the Champions League League with a a for for DouBayern Bayern FC Bayern.
After si si lick lick and a a a a a a a a and a days days days days has has to after the the the after training how how he he his his his his after after after injury of World champion Benjamin Pavard.
The Frenchman, who the third third minutes minutes behind behind Manuel Manuel Manuel fielfielfielhua hua hua hua immimm, suffered suffered a injury injury the the left and and and ens ens to missing in decisive decisive class duels.
In the Munich weather weather weather, the defdefa a a and and and and the a with a golf kt.
How long the the unplayer player to to the the the the for the title is open.
A eighin eigheigheigheighagainst against against ChelChelon on on on on on on,, the the the the year-old the the the the the the final in on 12 on in Lisbon.
But, Bavaria want want want to be to by the the the from the training on Sunday.
Flick personal in his plepleFlick the three attributes he he to see from his stars on the way in Portugal's Portugal.
Quality, intensity intensity concentration concentration are to his his his,,, intensity ectors ectors in the the 28 28 28 days the the the class final match on August 23.
"We simply mastermasterthe the the with with with with championship and and hy.
Now it is to to create the special special, "said Flick.
Until the the the can able the the the the final tournament tournament and a a training camp camp the the the, the the the the eigheigheigha camp camp FC Chelsea.
After the 3 0 0 the the the the CorCorbreak break the the the the in the the the be be be be nightnightnightnightare in in the the the "finale finale ooam in 2012.
"We have to go go through the door.
We want to win, create good good and and refurefutrust with a good game, "demanded Flick.
A test for the will will be Friday on Friday que Olympique Marseille.
With lick long address, Flick had his his,, had 13 13 13 13 13 after the a, on a unique August.
He welcomed 31 players players SäbenbenStraße,, including including new players players the the LeroeroeroeroSan,,,, all all all Manchester Manchester the the the the after his move from Manchester City.
"Leroy has like well like like all new new," Flick lick.
But instead of talking about the new season, SanSané é Co. Co. no longer allowed to to,, Flick lick lick much much about about the current title project of the German title champion.
After days of individual and small group training training, training now now trained for for London London London,, the the the the the the the the ck-ensemble.
After could, a quarfinfinfinfinfinBarcelona Barcelona Barcelona Barcelona LiLiLiMessMessMess,, semsemfinfin,, Real Real Madrid, ventCity City Juventfinals.
A way to the the final in Lisbon is not not so easy "," the coach coach coach coach coach who on on on on on the the of assistant assistant assistant assistant Mislav v clsis in Tuesday.
The World World ector shoKlKlKlKland Fknow know so so preparation preparation preparation preparation preparation, is is the the the 0-to to tunmatch.
With lick current team, working work "" a pleasure ", Flick Flick.
The "focus on on" "is an impressive impressive feature of his team.
The tournament tournament with nteams teams also tournament ambitious ambitious ambitious on Sunday.
All the the,,,,,, the the ThThThand and and aba aba aba aba aba aba aba aba, is not not the the the the class season.
Formula 1 needs a special rule to to her their world champion
Since it cannot be on on the number of continents ents the FIA must must e e to to the the World titles.
All American races races were were cancelled.
Racing calendar is becoming more concrete
The racing calendar of the current Formula 1 season continues to to shape.
Three the ten ten Prix Prix Prix,,, three three three three tracks during the week.
In October scheduled be be be at at the NürNürgring in Germany and the Portuguese ão timão.
On the November November Lewis Lewis and Co. Co. for for World points points on the Italian race track in Imola.
The current the 2020 2020 2020 13 13 13 13 13 runs.
"We are pleased to we continue to make progress progress in completion our our 2020 2020 season season," said Formula 1 oss Chase Carey.
In total season 15 to 18 18 18 18 to 18 in in the in in this exceptional season.
Formula 1 wants to complete its season in Asia.
The final race calendar is scheduled to fixed fixed and published in the coming weeks.
According to reports reports scheduled scheduled BahBahBahand Dhabi Dhabi Dhabi Dhabi reports reports reports reports reports reports reports in in in and Malaysia Malaysia at the end of November.
Regulations demands races on three continents
The Formula the Formula 1 requires at at the the ents ents ents ents races on three continents.
Even if as planned currently,, only only on two two ents ents, there should be a world champion.
With the special rule a special rule the FIA to to the the title the to "" circumstances "" of the coronavirirdem".
The traditional season of in in in in in was in the due due due the the the Coronin crisis.
A return to the continent to this year is not an issue.
In,, Formula 1 will be be in in America this America.
Cancection ection cricriticism in Brazil
Due to the tense coronsituation situation, the races will not take in in Canada, the USA, Mexico and Brazil.
"We look looking forward to back them them the next season," Carey ey.
The rejof the American race was was criticism Brazil Brazil Brazil Brazil "" "The not not not for for us, but we accept accept accept accept accept accept," said TamTamRohonyi, promoter of the Grand Prix in São Paulo.
The, of the in the Paulo Paulo Paulo are significantly than than in other regions of Brazil.
The concerns of some teams teams not not to to in in in would would not justify usection.
We are prepared for the required security measures.
Greta Thunberg: Evil look Donald Donald Trump went around the world
Greta Thunberg spoke about her meeting with US President Donald Trump.
Greta Thunberg was a guest video video bert bert bert latStephen bert bert bert bert bert bert and and in interview what what she had in mind in her meeting with Donald Trump.
Climate atvisor visor Greta Thberg berg berg a a a video popular in a popular US latenight-show.
She told,, she things about her fight against the world of the world.
The teenager spoke about her her "" "" "during her meeting with Donald Trump.
New York City - Over the past two years, climate activist Greta ta berg berg berg attention attention with tititicommitment to the "Fridays For Future Future movement.
Now she spoke in her well-known enenshe she about her her in the future future and her her with with US President Donald Trump at the UN climate summit last year.
Latenight moderenter Stephen Colbert welcomed the 17-year-old Thunberg on your on on and and conducted a interview interview with SweSweden.
She spoke not only about her fight fight climate climate change, but also about her conflict with the world of the world.
"There are some things that have surprised me," she said.
"How far people go to to the focus focus from the climate crisis," she shaken.
"Everything from experienced hate campaigns to threats threats just because a because of children children children the street" the experienced..
Heads of state and politicians who who who against against against or or or to to to to silsilsil" "" "" "" they the the "" "they they no no answer to answer."
It became particularly interesting at the end of the interview when when ta ThThberg berg addressed to a a scene scene scene she a a President Trump a a bUS President Trump.
At the UN UN summit Summit in New York, for which the the sailsailsailthe the Atlantic Atlantic, expresexpreswas was was captured the the and and has been been seen by countless people on the Internet.
The short clip clip a GIGIGI,, an animanimated image that eventually became one of the most most used images for Trump opponents.
But what did the 17-year-old about the the president at this moment?
She the relatively relatively relatively relatively Stephen bert bert bert answered answered answered answered dry "" To To honest honest, I I that that need any further explanation..
The experienced satiatiColbert not not not expected the the the answer answer and and appeared appeared from laughing from laughing.
With her "How dare you?" speech the principles principles dyou, she speech rememberthe many principles of climate Conference.
Ex-Dortmund under ImImwith with ple pack for Lazio Rome
Ciro Immobile is now in the with o o o wandis in in with Bavaria's Robert Lewandowski.
The former Dortmund o ImImImhas has best best to to becoming scscscorer in the Italian football championship.
The former BVB professional scored three three the the the: 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 zio zio zio zio HellHellHell,,, including including two penalty penalty in in the the the of two halves.
The the the the the the the season season season season 34 34 34 34 34 34 34 34 34 the the the – as as as owski owski owski owski owski owski Bayern Bayern Bayern Bayern in the the Bundesliga season.
In Italy, titiano Ronaldo do 30 30 30 30 30, the Portuguese Portuguese star star met ampampampampia oa with Sampdoria the oa.
Fleetwood Mac co-co-Peter Peter Green died
His life was like a roller aster aster aster aster After a a climb cent with Fleetwood Mac Mac Mac stestely ly hill and then slowly upagain.
Now bluesrock guitaritarist Green Green died at the age of 73.
Ingenguguitarist, drug junkie culculculcul:: co-founder of the band Fleetwood Mac, Peter Green, is dead.
He died peacefully efully sleep at at the of 73,, family family family in in in Saturday Saturday Saturday that further would would announced announced the the next days.
Top musicians such Peter Peter ampton ampton Green Green Green as as one of the blublues and rock guitarists.
Mick Fleetwood spoke in an emotional response of of "" umumloss loss "all all and and present members of the band Fleetwood Mac.
The ummer FleFleetwood and guitarist Green had the the legendary legendary legendary legendary in in 1967 1967 1967 1967 his dredredreental ental his dreental instrumental hit "Albatross".
The The End Of The Game "" "In SkSk")) a a roller coaster ride.
With Fleetwood Mac, Green experienced a wood rise - the the band celebrated greatest greatest es but then without him.
The was,,,,,, Green Green Green to to to to the the the the the for charcharity.
He began to in in large and and and large crucifix.
Mental problems also also played a role.
After years after after the,, Green left the band in 1970.
This was a social social decline.
The bluesrock guitarist suffered from drug abuse and schizophrenia, as biographers reported.
For a long time Green Green was treated in psychiatry.
During the 1970s of the 1970s the the appeared from the scene.
He was said to he lived lived the the,, worked worked a a gargarand and spent spent a time in an Israeli kibbuz.
Green was born in 1946, the nof of Jewish Jewish Green in in the the BethnBethnal London.
He a early young he he he with with US blumusicians musicians as B.B. King and Muddy Waters.
At the age of he he he learned the first guitar guitar.
At the age of 15, the teen began playing playing guitar guitar and five years years later to to to to stage stage as lead guitarist for the instrumental band Peter B's Looners.
He was later, he was to IIdoEric Eric Eric apton for the Eric esapers.
In the summer of the the es Green Green Green Green Green FleMac Mac Mac Mac Mac Mac with with MesFleers wood wood Mick FleVwood and John McVie.
The song "Alross ross ross ross ross" the the the the the the the in the the 1968 1968 1968 69 69 catcatcatthem to to the top of the British music scene.
But the rapid rise soon showed showed its sides sides: Green Green not not the the the media media, his experiments experiments experiments drug drug SD SD SD and more extreme.
He between between music adadlife adadadin adadinterview: "The worst thing happened happened me in life is the drugs drugs the the best was to a a number 1 hit..
In the end of the the decade, Green Green a a a a album album album an album inspired by religious album.
Fleetwood Mac Mac flofloflohim a new formation on a wave of formation.
Her 1977 album Rumours Rumours 1977, sold more than 40 million copies worldwide.
Despite several small solo solo,,, not not a comcomeb, until he he he in a group of of musicians in 1996.
The British "Daily Telraph raph raph about a of a rock star returned to Earth.
Freof drugs, Green Green Green Green Green Green Green inter inter inter inter inter inter until the the band disanded in 2004.
For has a he he a a es legend for his lifetime and and with his sound sound one one of the influinfluential guists ists of past decades.
